Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1559
Pensions of disabled soldiers and sailors; property purchased therewith; limit.

In addition to the exemptions otherwise provided for, there shall also be exempt from levy and sale upon execution or attachment, to every resident of the State of Nebraska, who became disabled in the service of the United States as a soldier, sailor or marine, all pension money hereafter received and all property hereafter purchased and improved exclusively therewith, not exceeding two thousand dollars in value, of and belonging to such soldier, sailor or marine.

Laws 1887, c. 101, § 1, p. 656;

R.S.1913, § 8106;

C.S.1922, § 9042;

C.S.1929, § 20-1560;

R.S.1943, § 25-1559.

Pension money is exempt, and exemption covers property bought therewith, exchanged, and increase up to two thousand dollars. Dargan v. Williams, 66 Neb. 1, 91 N.W. 862 (1902).